Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,242.03
Convenience store, defined.

Convenience store shall mean a food establishment or section of an establishment where the food offered to the consumer is intended for off-premise consumption and there are no meat processing or produce processing areas.

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 7.